Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 3. State Mining Council

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals § 257.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 378.

§ 30-2-301.
Board of mines renamed mining council; created; composition; qualifications, appointment and term of members; removal; officers; rules; quorum; vacancies; compensation.

There is created a state board of mines which is renamed the state mining council within the department of workforce services which shall consist of eleven (11) members. Ten (10) members shall be appointed equally from among the management and hourly employees of the mining industry, including surface and underground coal mining, and shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified except for the inspector who is a member of the council and entitled to vote in case of a tie. Each member of the council, except the inspector, shall be a qualified elector of the state and shall have at least five (5) years experience in the mining industry immediately preceding his appointment. The members shall be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate and from among the management and employees of the mining industry. The tenure of the members of the council shall be so arranged that the terms of not more than five (5) of the members shall expire in any one (1) year period. The governor may remove any council member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The council shall have among its appointed members:

An underground coal or gassy mine management official;

A practical underground coal or gassy mine member; and

A mining engineer.

The officers of the council are a president and a vice-president, elected by the council from among its members, and a secretary who need not be a member of the council. The council has the power and duty to formulate and adopt rules consistent with the provisions of law to govern its own operation and functions. A majority of the combined council represents a quorum necessary to transact council business.

Appointments, terms and the filling of vacancies shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

Members of the council shall receive compensation, per diem and travel expenses in the same manner and amount as the state legislature while going to, attending or returning from council meetings or official committee meetings. An official committee shall be any committee of two (2) or more council members created by a majority vote of a quorum of the council.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 80, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 23-121; C.S. 1945, § 57-302; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 66; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 1, 5, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-41, 30-43, 30-45, 30-120; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-201

,

30-2-203

,

30-2-205

,

30-3-302

; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 2001, ch. 78, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the introductory language of (a).

§ 30-2-302.
State mining council to act in conjunction with inspector.

The council shall act in conjunction with the inspector to improve safety, health, training, examinations and certification of miners in mining operations and mines, in the production and the processing of minerals, and in all installations, equipment and operations constituting a part of mining operations and mines.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-42; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-202

; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to inspector of mines generally, see article 2 of this chapter.

§ 30-2-303.
Regular and special meetings of mining council; record of proceedings.

Regular meetings of the council shall be quarterly at a place within this state determined by the council. Special meetings may be called at any time by the governor, by the president of the council or by the inspector of mines and shall be called upon the request of any three (3) council members. Full and complete minutes and records of all council meetings, proceedings and actions shall be kept and preserved.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 30-44; Laws 1959, ch. 124, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-204

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 2003, ch. 5, § 1.

§§ 30-2-304 and 30-2-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 88, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 80, §§ 1 and 2, and Laws 1925, ch. 80, § 3, respectively, related to the creation of an examining board, and the election of a chairman for the examining board and the appointment of a secretary.

§ 30-2-306.
State mining council; examinations for certificates; duty as to examinations generally; meetings; notice of meetings.

The state mining council shall examine applicants for certification as mine foreman and mine examiner, and shall issue certificates of competency to qualified applicants who pass the examination. The council shall meet at least annually in May at Rock Springs to examine applicants for certificates and may meet at other times and places. The council shall decide the day and place of all meetings. At least fifteen (15) days notice of the place and date of every meeting of the council held for the purpose of examining applicants shall be given by publication in a newspaper published in the area where the examination is to be held, and by posting copies of the published notice at all mines in the vicinity of said place. A meeting held pursuant to this section may be held in conjunction with regular council meetings required by W.S.

30-2-303

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 80, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 23-123; Laws 1935, ch. 110, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 57-304; W.S. 1957, § 30-122; Laws 1959, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

30-3-304

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-2-307.
State mining council; nature of examination generally; grading; record to be kept; public inspection of record; fees for examination and certificate; replacement.

The state mining council shall ascertain the experience, knowledge and understanding of each applicant for the position for which he desires a certificate. The council shall examine applicants for mine examiner and mine foreman both orally and in writing. To obtain a certificate the applicant shall obtain a total weighted average grade of seventy-five percent (75%). A complete record shall be made of each examination, including all questions and answers, both oral and written. The record shall be filed with the inspector and maintained permanently as a public record.

Each applicant shall pay an examination fee which shall be set annually by the council and shall be based upon anticipated testing expenditures. The council upon satisfactory proof of loss or destruction of a certificate shall issue a duplicate upon receipt of five dollars ($5.00). All fees collected by the council shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to a separate account and shall be used for the administration of the mine foreman and mine examiner certification examinations.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 80, §§ 5, 8; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-124, 23-127; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-305, 57-308; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-123, 30-128, 30-129; W.S. 1977, §§

30-3-305

, 30-3-310, 30-3-311; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1985, ch. 25, § 1; 1990, ch. 26, § 1; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 9, ch. 80, Laws 1925, repealed C.S. 1920, §§ 4444 to 4446.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 30-2-308.
Mine foremen; when required; duties; mines to be supervised by certified personnel.

Each underground mine with one (1) or more persons present underground shall be supervised by a certified mine foreman who shall ensure compliance with mining laws regarding his duties and the health and safety of mine employees. A certified mine foreman shall remain underground when persons are present underground unless authorized by a variance issued by the council. The mine foreman shall not permit any person to work in an unsafe place unless it be for the purpose of making it safe. Work for the purpose of making a place safe shall be under the direct supervision of a certified mine foreman. The mine foreman shall provide data and information regarding the operation of the mine required by the inspector.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 30-124; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-306; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2003, ch. 5, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to examination of mine foreman by examining board, see §

30-2-306

.

§ 30-2-309.
Mine foreman and mine examiner certificates; qualifications; certificate required; reciprocity; council duties.

No person shall act as mine foreman or safety engineer at any underground mine unless he holds a mine foreman certificate for the type of mineral being mined. To obtain a mine foreman certificate for a particular mineral an applicant shall pass the required examination for the particular mineral. An applicant for the mine foreman examination shall:

Be at least twenty-three (23) years of age;

Except as otherwise provided, provide verifiable documentation that he has at least three (3) years practical experience in the mining of the mineral in which he desires to hold a mine foreman certificate. Practical experience shall be determined from practical work of a “hands-on” nature, directly related to the hazards involved in the type of mine for which the certificate is sought. Underground coal mine experience shall qualify for gassy metal or nonmetal mine experience. The council may grant one (1) year’s experience credit for not less than five (5) years’ experience in an underground gassy metal or nonmetal mine for underground coal mine experience. Surface mine experience in a different mineral may be considered by the council when qualifying an applicant to take the examination for surface foreman certification. The council may grant one (1) year experience credit for not less than ten (10) years experience in another type of mine or in an industry similar in nature to mining;

Complete and timely file an examination application;

When the applicant seeks to receive practical experience credit for holding a mining engineering degree, provide verifiable documentation of the degree; and

Hold a valid mine examiner’s certificate.

No person shall act as a mine examiner in any underground mine unless he holds a mine examiner certificate for the type of mineral being mined. To obtain a mine examiner certificate for a particular mineral an applicant shall pass the required examination for the particular mineral. An applicant for the mine examiner examination shall:

Provide verifiable documentation that he has at least two (2) years practical experience in the type of mineral mined in which he desires to hold a mine examiner certificate. Practical experience shall be determined from practical work of a “hands-on” nature, directly related to the hazards involved in the type of mine for which the certificate is sought. Underground coal mine experience shall qualify for gassy metal or nonmetal mine experience. Gassy metal or nonmetal mine experience shall not qualify for underground coal mine experience;

Complete and timely file an examination application;

Be at least twenty-three (23) years of age; and

When the applicant seeks to receive practical experience credit for holding an engineering degree, provide verifiable documentation of the degree.

A mining engineering degree from an accredited college or university shall be considered the equivalent of one (1) year practical experience for mine foreman certificate and one (1) year for mine examiner certificate. An approved degree from an accredited college or university which degree is related to mining may be considered the equivalent of one (1) year practical experience for mine foreman certificate and one (1) year for mine examiner certificate. In no case shall practical experience credit for a degree, mining experience credit or a combination thereof exceed one (1) year for a mine foreman certificate or one (1) year for a mine examiner certificate. For purposes of this section a degree shall be limited to a baccalaureate, master’s or doctorate degree.

Any person holding a certificate of competency from a proper examining board of any state with which Wyoming has a reciprocal agreement may perform the duties in Wyoming for which his certificate certifies that he is competent, without examination by the state mining council. Before assuming any duties in a mine, the person shall present his certificate to the council through the inspector and secure approval of the certificate by the council. The person is subject to examination by the council at the request of the inspector. The person’s authority to act in Wyoming as mine foreman, mine examiner or safety engineer may be cancelled in the same manner as certificates issued by the council. No person shall employ any mine foreman, mine examiner or safety engineer in an underground mine who does not possess the certificate of competency required.

The state mining council shall include in its rules for implementation of this article, the following:

Procedures for review and approval of a study manual prepared by industry to provide guidance to those taking the examinations;

Procedures for preparing the examinations by the council or a committee of council members appointed for this purpose, provided that final approval of the examination shall be made by the council;

Procedures for grading examinations;

Procedures for reviewing the examination results by an applicant with a designated committee of the council and provisions for appeal by an applicant of any adverse decision of the council;

Each examination shall include questions to ascertain the applicant’s general knowledge of mining practices in the type of mine and mineral involved, including but not limited to ventilation, health and safety, rescue and recovery work involved following mine disasters, detection and control of gasses, fire and explosion prevention and control, use of blasting procedures, electricity and mine equipment and knowledge of the applicable state mining laws. The examination shall also properly identify the importance of any single question which if not answered correctly would cause failure of the entire examination;

Criteria for granting experience credit for purposes of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 5, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 30-125; Laws 1973, ch. 16, § 1; 1974, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-307; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 1995, ch. 30, § 1; 2003, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 5, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 31, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), added “Except as otherwise provided,” rewrote the third sentence, and added the last sentence; rewrote (c) to allow an approved degree from an accredited college or university related to mining to be considered the equivalent of one year practical experience for a mine foreman certificate and one year for a mine examiner certificate; added (e)(vi); and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Operator's duty to provide safe work place. —

Statute charging mining foreman with certain duties of inspection does not relieve the operator of his duty to provide a safe place in which the miners may perform their work. Owl Creek Coal Co. v. Goleb, 210 F. 209, 1914 U.S. App. LEXIS 1991 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1914) (decided under prior law).

§ 30-2-310.
Temporary permit; when permitted; expiration; subsequent examination required.

The inspector, upon consent of the state mining council, may issue to an applicant a temporary permit to operate as a mine foreman or mine examiner without a certificate if the applicant meets the requirements of W.S.

30-2-309

other than the examination requirement. The temporary permit shall expire on the date of the next examination given by the council after issuance of the temporary permit. A person issued a temporary permit under this section for a particular type of mineral shall not be issued an additional temporary permit for the same type of mineral if he failed:

The certification examination for that type of mineral; or

To take the certification examination for that type of mineral.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 80, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 23-126; Laws 1939, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 57-307; W.S. 1957, § 30-127; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-309; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 30-2-311.
Revocation of certificate after notice and hearing; suspension; reexamination; revocation of certificate of inspector or deputy; filing of certificate.

Any certificate issued by the council or temporary permit issued by the inspector may be suspended or revoked by the council for violation of this act or rules and regulations promulgated under this act, intoxication while in duty status, mental disabilities or neglect of duty. Except as otherwise provided, the council may revoke or suspend a certificate or temporary permit only after a hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The council may suspend any certificate or temporary permit pending further investigation and hearing, for actions that pose a serious threat to the health and safety of miners. The council shall establish by rule a time limit after the alleged date of an incident as provided in this subsection within which a complaint shall be filed. All complaints shall be verified and filed in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the council. The council or designated members of the council may, after reviewing the complaint and conducting any investigation deemed necessary, determine that the grounds alleged do not warrant suspension or revocation and dismiss the complaint without hearing. No person whose certificate has been revoked under this section for less than ninety (90) days shall be examined by the council. No person whose certificate has been revoked under this section shall be reissued a certificate unless the council finds the incapacity, if any, on which the revocation was based has ceased to exist.

When the council revokes the mine foreman certificate of the inspector or a deputy inspector, the governor shall forthwith remove such person from office.

The holder of a mine foreman or mine examiner certificate shall present it to the official of the mine where he is employed, who shall file it in the mine office. The certificate shall be made available for inspection by interested persons.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 30-128; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-310; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 34, § 1; 2003, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, see W.S.

16-3-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-312.
Optional certifications of surface mine foremen and mine examiners; surface mine operators not required to employ.

The state mining council may certify a mine foreman, safety engineer or mine examiner desiring to work in a surface mine upon request by an applicant for the certificate. Certificates shall be issued under W.S.

30-2-307

and 30-2-309(a) through (d). Applicants and certificate holders are subject to W.S.

30-2-310

and

30-2-311

.

No owner or operator of a surface mine is required to employ a certified mine foreman, safety engineer or mine examiner.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 2003, ch. 5, § 1.